Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-160
Board; member; removal; procedure; grounds.

(1) The State Board of Health shall have power to remove from office at any time any member of a board for which it appoints the membership, after a public hearing pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, for physical or mental incapacity to carry out the duties of a board member, for continued neglect of duty, for incompetency, for acting beyond the individual member's scope of authority, for malfeasance in office, for not maintaining the qualifications established in sections 38-164 and 38-165, for any cause for which a credential in the profession or business involved may be suspended or revoked under section 38-178 or 38-179, or for a lack of a credential in the profession or business involved.

(2) The State Board of Health shall have full access to such complaints or investigational records as necessary and appropriate in the discharge of its duties under subsection (1) of this section and section 38-158.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 18, p. 458;

C.S.1929, § 71-308;

R.S.1943, § 71-118;

Laws 1979, LB 427, § 9;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 35;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 27;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 187, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 20;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 22;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-118;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 60.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.